Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.282

Compliance with RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.280.

No state department, agency, board, or commission shall expend money in excess of appropriations provided by law based on the receipt of unanticipated revenues without complying with the provisions of RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.280.

[ 1973 c 144 s 4.]